Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1020.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6103 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 6103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Vacant and blighted property." A blighted property that is vacant.Section 2. Section 6141 of Title 53 is amended to read:§ 6141. [(Reserved).] Vacant and blighted property registration.12345678910111213141516171819 (a) Authorization.--(1) A municipality may impose and collect, by ordinance, a vacant and blighted property registration fee consistent with this section on properties deemed vacant and blighted. (2) A municipality choosing to enact an ordinance under paragraph (1) may contract with a third-party entity to execute the vacant and blighted property registry and to collect the registration fees and fines allowed under this chapter.(3) A municipality with a vacant and blighted property registration ordinance in place prior to the effective date of this subsection shall not be required to amend the ordinance to comply with the provisions of this section.(4) A municipality with an existing program for vacant and blighted property registration may continue to operate the program without impacting any other law authorizing the municipality to regulate vacant or blighted property.(5) A municipality that elects to impose an ordinance under paragraph (1) shall establish a process for the removal of properties from the registry and shall disclose the process for removal to the property owner at the time of listing, including any requirement to bring the property up to municipal code existing under other applicable State law.(b) Listing required.--A municipality that elects to impose and collect a registration fee under this section shall compile and maintain a vacant and blighted properties list that identifies by address and owner all vacant and blighted properties in the municipality. Each listing shall contain the date each vacant and blighted property was listed.(c) Amount of registration fee.--A registration fee shall be 20250HB1020PN1100 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 imposed on the owner of a vacant and blighted property for each year that the vacant and blighted property is not in compliance with the municipal code, subject to the following:(1) If the property owner brings the property into compliance with the municipal code within 12 months or sells the property to an entity that brings the property into compliance with the municipal code, the fee shall be waived in accordance with section 3 of the act of December 20, 2000 (P.L.724, No.99), known as the Municipal Code and Ordinance Compliance Act.(2) The fee shall be $500 one year from the date on which the property was listed on the registry.(3) The fee shall be $1,000 two years from the date on which the property was listed on the registry.(4) The fee shall be $2,000 three and four years from the date on which the property was listed on the registry.(5) The fee shall be $3,500 five through eight years from the date on which the property was listed on the registry.(6) The fee shall be $5,000 nine or more years from the date on which the property was listed on the registry.(7) Property owned by the Federal or State Government or a county, municipality, redevelopment authority, housing authority or land bank, including one of their instrumentalities, which is required to register under this section is exempt from the registration fees under this subsection.(d) Exempt vacant and blighted properties.--A vacant and blighted property shall be exempt from inclusion on the vacant and blighted properties list under subsection (b), except as 20250HB1020PN1100 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 otherwise provided in paragraph (3), and from the registration fees under subsection (c) if the vacant and blighted property is:(1) Under active construction or undergoing active rehabilitation, renovation or repair and a permit to make the property fit for human occupancy was issued, renewed or extended within 12 months of the required registration date.(2) In compliance with all Federal, State and local laws and the owner or the owner's agent has been actively seeking in good faith to rent or sell the property. T he time frame for rent or sale may not exceed:(i) one year from the initial listing, offer or advertisement of sale, in the case of a residential property;(ii) two years from the initial listing, offer or advertisement of sale, in the case of a commercial property; or(iii) one year from the initial listing, offer or advertisement to rent, provided that any leased property exempt under this paragraph has a valid certificate of occupancy from the municipality.(3) Exempted by the municipality upon a showing of economic hardship by the owner and that the owner is working with the municipality to bring the property into compliance with all Federal, State and local codes. An exemption under this paragraph shall be subject to the following provisions:(i) The exemption may be granted for a time frame not to exceed 12 months from the required registration date, subject to renewal on the basis of continuing economic hardship. The municipality may withdraw the 20250HB1020PN1100 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exemption at any time.(ii) The exemption may be granted for a time frame not to exceed 24 months, if the property is subject to a probate proceeding or the title is the subject of litigation, not including a foreclosure of the right of redemption action.(iii) The exemption may be granted for a time frame not to exceed 12 months, if the property is subject to a pending application for a necessary approval for development before State, regional or municipal planning or zoning authorities and is maintained according to all Federal, State and local laws.(iv) The cumulative time frame for an exemption from registration as provided under this paragraph for a vacant and blighted property under the same, substantially similar or related ownership shall not exceed 36 consecutive months.(4) Owned by a member of the United States military presently on active duty if the property is in compliance with all Federal, State or local codes.(e) Right of appeal.--An ordinance adopted under this section shall provide an opportunity for an appeal under 2 Pa.C.S. § 752 (relating to appeals) by the owner of property that is deemed vacant and blighted property.(f) Penalties.-- (1) An owner of vacant and blighted property who fails to pay the registration fees required by this section shall be assessed a penalty of $25 per day if the vacant and blighted property is residential and $50 per day if the vacant and blighted property is commercial or industrial for 20250HB1020PN1100 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each day that the owner fails to pay the registration fee . The owner shall also be subject to penalties assessed under all other applicable Federal, State and local laws.(2) The amount of any unpaid fee authorized under this section shall constitute a lien against the property and shall be collected in the same manner as municipal claims by the municipality.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1020PN1100 - 6 - 12345678